Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-214
Fugitive to this state; capture authorized.

Any military forces or organization, unit or detachment thereof, of another state who are in fresh pursuit of insurrectionists, saboteurs, enemies or enemy forces, may continue such pursuit into this state until the military or police forces of this state or the forces of the United States have had a reasonable opportunity to take up the pursuit or to apprehend or capture such persons, and are hereby authorized to arrest or capture such persons within this state while in fresh pursuit.

Laws 1941, c. 116, § 6, p. 449;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 55-406;

R.S.1943, § 55-214.